incubator/apertium-pes/dev/apertium-far.far.dix
	<pardef n="zamireenekasidovommofrad__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="zamireenekasisevommofradmozakar__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="zamireenekasisevommofradmoanas__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="zamireenekasiavaljam__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="zamireenekasidovomjam__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="zamireenekasisevomjam__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="zamiremobham__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="eshare__n">
       <e><p><l/><r><s n="dem"/><s n="nr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
	  <e><p><l/><r><s n="dem"/><s n="fr"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="zamireshare__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="dem"/><s n="nr"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="dem"/><s n="fr"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
   </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="avalshakhsemofradsubj__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 
	
	<pardef n="dovomshakhsemofradsubj__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      </pardef>

	   <pardef n="sevomshakhsemofradsubj__n">
        <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      </pardef>
	  
      <pardef n="avalshakhsejamsubj__n">
        <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	  </pardef>

	   <pardef n="dovomshakhsejamsubj__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	 </pardef>

	 <pardef n="sevomshakhsejamsubj__n">
       <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="subj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	 </pardef>

     <pardef n="melkimofrad1__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
   
   	<pardef n="melkimofrad2__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
      </pardef>

	  <pardef n="melkimofrad3__n">
        <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
       </pardef>
	  
      <pardef n="melkijam1__n">
        <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
	  </pardef>

	  <pardef n="melkijam2__n">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
	 </pardef>

	 <pardef n="melkijam3__n">
       <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
	 </pardef>

    <pardef n="encnakare__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="encrabtimofrad__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encrabtijam__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkimofrad1__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkimofrad2__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkimofrad3__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="psg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkijam1__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkijam2__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkijam3__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ppl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkirabtimofrad__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="rel"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkim1rabtimofrad__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="psg"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rsg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkim2rabtimofrad__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="psg"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rsg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkim3rabtimofrad__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="psg"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rsg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkij1rabtimofrad__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="ppl"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rsg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkij2rabtimofrad__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ppl"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rsg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkij3rabtimofrad__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ppl"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rsg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkim1rabtijam__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="psg"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rpl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkim2rabtijam__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="psg"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rpl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkim3rabtijam__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="psg"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rpl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkij1rabtijam__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="ppl"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rpl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkij2rabtijam__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ppl"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rpl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encmelkij3rabtijam__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ppl"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rpl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="encnakaregen__n">
     <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="melkimofrad1rabtijam__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="psg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rpl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="mafulim1mofrad__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="mafulim2mofrad__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="mafulim3mofrad__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="mafulim1jam__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="mafulim2jam__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="mafulim3jam__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="melkimofrad2rabtijam__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="psg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rpl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="melkimofrad3rabtijam__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="psg"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rpl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="melkijam1rabtijam__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="ppl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rpl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="melkijam2rabtijam__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="ppl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rpl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<pardef n="melkijam3rabtijam__n">
    <e><p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ppl"/><s n="enc"/><s n="rel"/><s n="rpl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

	<e lm="این"><i>این</i><par n="eshare__n"/></e>
	<e lm="آن"><i>آن</i><par n="eshare__n"/></e>
	<e lm="همین"><i>همین</i><par n="eshare__n"/></e>
	<e lm="همان"><i>همان</i><par n="eshare__n"/></e>
	<e lm="این‌ها"><i>این‌ها</i><par n="zamireshare__n"/></e>
	<e lm="آن‌ها"><i>آن‌ها</i><par n="zamireshare__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آنها"><i>آنها</i><par n="zamireshare__n"/></e>
	<e lm="من"><i>من</i><par n="avalshakhsemofradsubj__n"/></e>
	<e lm="تو"><i>تو</i><par n="dovomshakhsemofradsubj__n"/></e>
	<e lm="او"><i>او</i><par n="sevomshakhsemofradsubj__n"/></e>
	<e lm="وی"><i>وی</i><par n="sevomshakhsemofradsubj__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ما"><i>ما</i><par n="avalshakhsejamsubj__n"/></e>
	<e lm="شما"><i>شما</i><par n="dovomshakhsejamsubj__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ایشان"><i>ایشان</i><par n="sevomshakhsejamsubj__n"/></e>
	<e lm="آن‌ها"><i>آن‌ها</i><par n="sevomshakhsejamsubj__n"/></e>
    <e lm="آنها"><i>آنها</i><par n="sevomshakhsejamsubj__n"/></e>
	<e lm="آنان"><i>آنان</i><par n="sevomshakhsejamsubj__n"/></e>
	<e lm="م"><i>م</i><par n="melkimofrad1__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ت"><i>ت</i><par n="melkimofrad2__n"/></e>
	<e lm="ش"><i>ش</i><par n="melkimofrad3__n"/></e>
	<e lm="مان"><i>مان</i><par n="melkijam1__n"/></e>
	<e lm="تان"><i>تان</i><par n="melkijam2__n"/></e>
	<e lm="شان"><i>شان</i><par n="melkijam3__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خودت"><i>خودت</i><par n="zamireenekasidovommofrad__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خودش"><i>خودش</i><par n="zamireenekasisevommofradmozakar__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خودش"><i>خودش</i><par n="zamireenekasisevommofradmoanas__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خودمان"><i>خودمان</i><par n="zamireenekasiavaljam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خودتان"><i>خودتان</i><par n="zamireenekasidovomjam__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خودشان"><i>خودشان</i><par n="zamireenekasisevomjam__n"/></e>
